Utah statutes.
58-79-303.   Term of license -- Expiration -- renewal.
(1) (a)  The division shall issue each license under this chapter in
accordance with a two-year renewal cycle established by rule.
(b)  The division may by rule extend or shorten a renewal cycle by as much as
one year to stagger the renewal cycle it administers.
(2)  Each license automatically expires on the expiration date shown on the
license unless the licensee renews it in accordance with Section 58-1-308.
